bezhta_adj.lexd
PATTERNS 
#аттрибутивная парадигма
AdjRoot[aus,-cl] | AdjRoot[nopl,-cl] | AdjRoot[o,-cl] [<adj>:] AdjNumber[sg] Emphasis? 
AdjRoot[nopl,-cl] [<adj>:] AdjObl[sg] 
AdjRoot[suff,-cl] | AdjRoot[av,-cl] [<adj>:] [<abs.sg>:] Emphasis?
AdjRoot[suff,-cl] [<adj>:] AdjNumber[pl.a]|AdjObl[-avar]
AdjRoot[av] [<adj>:] AdjNumber[avar]|AdjObl[avar] Emphasis?
AdjRoot[aus,-cl] | AdjRoot[o,-cl]  [<adj>:] AdjNumber[pl.aus]|AdjObl[-avar]
AdjRoot[unk,-o] [<adj>:] [<abs.sg>:] | AdjNumber[-sg,-avar]

#классные прилагательные
Class AdjRoot[cl] [<adj>:] AdjNumber[sg] | AdjObl[sg] 
ClassPl AdjRoot[cl] | AdjRoot[cl,o] [<adj>:] AdjNumber[pl.aus] | AdjObl[-avar,-sg]

#субстантивная парадигма
AdjRoot[av] [<adj>:] AdjObl[avar,-pl]|[<obl.pl>:лā] Infl
AdjRoot[-av,-cl] [<adj>:] AdjObl[-avar] Infl |(Essive Directive? (Lative|Ablative|Translative)?)
AdjRoot[-av,-cl] [<adj>:] AdjObl[-avar] Infl[gen2] Essive (Lative|Ablative)?
AdjRoot[-av,-cl] [<adj>:] AdjObl[-avar] Essive Infl[gen2] (Lative|Ablative)?

Class AdjRoot[cl] [<adj>:] AdjObl[sg] Infl |(Essive Directive? (Lative|Ablative|Translative)?)
ClassPl AdjRoot[cl] [<adj>:] AdjObl[pl,-avar] Infl |(Essive Directive? (Lative|Ablative|Translative)?)
(Class AdjRoot[cl] [<adj>:] AdjObl[sg]) | (ClassPl [<adj>:] AdjRoot[cl] AdjObl[pl,-avar])  Infl[gen2] Essive (Lative|Ablative)?

LEXICON AdjNumber
<abs.sg>:о{UM}[sg]
<abs.pl>:а{UM}[pl.a]
<abs.pl>:вā[pl.a]
<abs.pl>:ла{UM}[avar]
<abs.pl>:ā{UM}[pl.aus]

LEXICON Emphasis
<emp>:со
<emp>:шоь

LEXICON AdjObl
<obl.sg>:а{UM}[sg]
<obl.sg>:ли[avar]
<obl.pl>:ā{UM}[pl]
<obl.pl>:ла{UM}[avar,pl]
